California, session 20252026, AB1649.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14005.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as amended by Section 71 of Chapter 42 of the Statutes of 2023, is amended to read:14005.12. (a) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, the department shall establish the income levels for maintenance need at the lowest levels that reasonably permit medically needy persons to meet their basic needs for food, clothing, and shelter, and for which federal financial participation will still be provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that the income levels for maintenance need for medically needy aged, blind, and disabled adults, in particular, shall be based upon amounts that adequately reflect their needs.(1) Subject to paragraph (2), reductions in the maximum aid payment levels set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in the 1991–92 fiscal year, and thereafter, shall not result in a reduction in the income levels for maintenance under this section.(2) (A) The department shall seek any necessary federal authorization for maintaining the income levels for maintenance at the levels in effect June 30, 1991.(B) If federal authorization is not obtained, medically needy persons shall not be required to pay the difference between the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on June 30, 1991, under Section 11450, and the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on July 1, 1991, and thereafter.(3) Any medically needy person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy for the calendar month immediately preceding the effective date of the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program as set forth in Section 11452.018 made in the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if all of the following apply:(A) The person had eligibility as categorically needy terminated by the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care.(B) The person, but for the reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter as categorically needy.(C) The person is ineligible to receive benefits without a spend down of excess income as a medically needy person pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).(b) In the case of a single individual, the amount of the income level for maintenance per month shall be 80 percent of the highest amount that would ordinarily be paid to a family of two persons, without any income or resources, under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.(c) In the case of a family of two adults, the income level for maintenance per month shall be the highest amount that would ordinarily be paid to a family of three persons without income or resources under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.(d) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, for a person in a medical institution or nursing facility, or for a person receiving institutional or noninstitutional services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed in accordance with, and for those purposes required by, Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Those amounts shall be computed pursuant to regulations that include providing for the following purposes:(1) (A) Personal and incidental needs in the amount of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) ($35), and, subject to subparagraph (B), not less than fifty dollars ($50) per month while a patient. patient. That amount shall increase annually by the cost-of-living adjustment implemented by the United States Social Security Administration pursuant to Section 415(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code, subject to subparagraph (B). The department may, by regulation, increase this amount as necessitated by increasing costs of personal and incidental needs. A long-term health care facility shall not charge an individual for the laundry services or periodic hair care specified in Section 14110.4.(B) (i) On the date that any necessary federal approvals described in clause (ii) are obtained, the minimum amount for personal and incidental needs shall be fifty dollars ($50) per month while a patient.(ii) This subparagraph shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(2) The upkeep and maintenance of the home.(3) The support and care of their minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly, if there is no community spouse.(4) If the person is an institutionalized spouse, for the support and care of their community spouse, minor or dependent children, dependent parents, or dependent siblings of either spouse, provided the individuals are residing with the community spouse.(5) The community spouse monthly income allowance shall be established at the maximum amount permitted in accordance with Section 1924(d)(1)(B) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(B)).(6) The family allowance for each family member residing with the community spouse shall be computed in accordance with the formula established in Section 1924(d)(1)(C) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(C)).(e) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, with regard to a person in a licensed community care facility, the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed pursuant to regulations adopted by the department that provide for the support and care of their spouse, minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly.(f) The income levels for maintenance per month, except as specified in subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, shall be equal to the highest amounts that would ordinarily be paid to a family of the same size without any income or resources under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.(g) The “federal financial participation rate,” as used in this section, shall mean 1331/3 percent, or such other rate set forth in Section 1903 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(b)), (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396b), or its successor provisions.(h) The income levels for maintenance per month shall not be decreased to reflect the presence in the household of persons receiving forms of aid other than Medi-Cal.(i) When family members maintain separate residences, but eligibility is determined as a single unit under Section 14008, the income levels for maintenance per month shall be established for each household in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (h), inclusive. The total of these levels shall be the level for the single eligibility unit.(j) The income levels for maintenance per month established pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, shall be calculated on an annual basis, rounded to the next higher multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), and then prorated.(k) If the conditions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.SEC. 2. Section 14005.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as amended by Section 72 of Chapter 42 of the Statutes of 2023, is amended to read:14005.12. (a) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, the department shall establish the income levels for maintenance need at the lowest levels that reasonably permit medically needy persons to meet their basic needs for food, clothing, and shelter, and for which federal financial participation will still be provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that the income levels for maintenance need for medically needy aged, blind, and disabled adults, in particular, shall be based upon amounts that adequately reflect their needs.(1) Subject to paragraph (2), reductions in the maximum aid payment levels set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in the 1991–92 fiscal year, and thereafter, shall not result in a reduction in the income levels for maintenance under this section.(2) (A) The department shall seek any necessary federal authorization for maintaining the income levels for maintenance at the levels in effect June 30, 1991, and, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2025, as described in subdivision (b).(B) If federal authorization is not obtained, medically needy persons shall not be required to pay the difference between the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on June 30, 1991, under Section 11450, and the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on July 1, 1991, and thereafter.(3) Any medically needy person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy for the calendar month immediately preceding the effective date of the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program as set forth in Section 11452.018 made in the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if all of the following apply:(A) The person had eligibility as categorically needy terminated by the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care.(B) The person, but for the reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter as categorically needy.(C) The person is ineligible to receive benefits without a spend down of excess income as a medically needy person pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).(b) (1) Effective no sooner than January 1, 2025, and to the extent the department determines the conditions described in paragraph (2) have been met, the amount of the income level for maintenance per month shall be equal to the income limit for Medi-Cal without a spend down of excess income for individuals described in Section 1396a(m)(1)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as that income limit is calculated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14005.40.(2) Implementation of this section is contingent on both of the following conditions:(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department.(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund resources are available to support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.(3) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in paragraph (2) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.(c) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, for a person in a medical institution or nursing facility, or for a person receiving institutional or noninstitutional services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed in accordance with, and for those purposes required by, Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Those amounts shall be computed pursuant to regulations that include providing for the following purposes:(1) (A) Personal and incidental needs in the amount of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) ($35), and, subject to subparagraph (B), not less than fifty dollars ($50) per month while a patient. patient. That amount shall increase annually by the cost-of-living adjustment implemented by the United States Social Security Administration pursuant to Section 415(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code, subject to subparagraph (B). The department may, by regulation, increase this amount as necessitated by increasing costs of personal and incidental needs. A long-term health care facility shall not charge an individual for the laundry services or periodic hair care specified in Section 14110.4.(B) (i) On the date that any necessary federal approvals described in clause (ii) are obtained, the minimum amount for personal and incidental needs shall be fifty dollars ($50) per month while a patient.(ii) This subparagraph shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(2) The upkeep and maintenance of the home.(3) The support and care of their minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly, if there is no community spouse.(4) If the person is an institutionalized spouse, for the support and care of their community spouse, minor or dependent children, dependent parents, or dependent siblings of either spouse, provided the individuals are residing with the community spouse.(5) The community spouse monthly income allowance shall be established at the maximum amount permitted in accordance with Section 1924(d)(1)(B) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(B)).(6) The family allowance for each family member residing with the community spouse shall be computed in accordance with the formula established in Section 1924(d)(1)(C) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(C)).(d) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, with regard to a person in a licensed community care facility, the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed pursuant to regulations adopted by the department that provide for the support and care of their spouse, minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly.(e) The income levels for maintenance per month shall not be decreased to reflect the presence in the household of persons receiving forms of aid other than Medi-Cal.(f) When family members maintain separate residences, but eligibility is determined as a single unit under Section 14008, the income levels for maintenance per month shall be established for each household in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive. The total of these levels shall be the level for the single eligibility unit.(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Within two calendar years of implementing subdivision (d) of Section 14005.12, the department shall adopt, amend, or repeal any necessary regulations.(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), whichever is later.